Idaho, session 2025, S1037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 66-906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
66-906. SUCCESSION TO PROPERTY OF DECEASED RESIDENT. Hereafter, the
application of any person for membership in a veterans home of this state and
the admission of the applicant thereunder shall be and constitute a valid
and binding contract between such applicant and the administrator of the
division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies
of the state of Idaho. Each applicant must agree prior to admission to any
veterans home that on the death of said applicant, while a member of such
home and leaving no heirs at law next of kin, all intangible property owned
by said applicant at the time of his death, including money or choses in
action held by him and not disposed of by will, whether such property be the
proceeds of pensions or otherwise derived, shall vest in and be delivered
to the unclaimed property division within the office of the state treasurer
within one (1) year after the member's death pursuant to section 14-513
14-5-201(1)(i), Idaho Code. The applicant's property may be reclaimed by
any legatee or person entitled to take the same by inheritance at any time
within five (5) years after the death of such member, unless the member di-
rects in writing that such property be donated to the division of veterans
services after the member's death. A certificate of death for the resident
is required for the division of veterans services to accept the donation.
Any tangible property unclaimed within thirty (30) days of the death or dis-
charge of said applicant is exempt from the revised unclaimed property act,
chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code, and shall be assigned to the state veterans
home. The administrator of the division of veterans services is directed
to so change the form of application for membership as to give reasonable
notice of this provision to each applicant and as to contain the consent of
the applicant to accept membership upon the conditions herein provided.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.